Indiana, session 2026, HB1283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-3-1-0.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.8. As used in this chapter, "state public notice
website" means the website established under IC 5-3-1.6.
SECTION 2. IC 5-3-1-0.9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 0.9. (a) This section applies to the publication of notice of
an event that meets both of the following requirements:
(1) Notice of the event is required by statute to be published two
(2) or more times.
(2) Notice is published:
(A) at least one (1) time before July 1, 2024; and
(B) at least one (1) time after June 30, 2024.
(b) Sections 0.2, 0.4, and 0.7 of this chapter (as in effect on June 30,
2024) continue to apply to any notices of the event that are published
after June 30, 2024, as if SEA 252-2024 had not been enacted.
(c) This section expires July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. IC 5-3-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2023,
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The cost of all public notice advertising
which any elected or appointed public official or governmental agency
is required by law to have published, or orders published, for which the
compensation to the newspapers, locality newspapers, or qualified
publications publishing such advertising is drawn from and is the
ultimate obligation of the public treasury of the governmental unit
concerned with the advertising shall be charged to and collected from
the proper fund of the public treasury and paid over to the newspapers,
locality newspapers, or qualified publications publishing such
advertising, after proof of publication and claim for payment has been
filed.
(b) The basic charges for publishing public notice advertising shall
be by the line and shall be computed based on a square of two hundred
and fifty (250) ems at the following rates:
(1) Before January 1, 1996, three dollars and thirty cents ($3.30)
per square for the first insertion in newspapers or qualified
publications plus one dollar and sixty-five cents ($1.65) per
square for each additional insertion in newspapers, or qualified
publications.
(2) After December 31, 1995, and before December 31, 2005, a
newspaper or qualified publication may, effective January 1 of
any year, increase the basic charges by five percent (5%) more
than the basic charges that were in effect during the previous year.
However, the basic charges for the first insertion of a public
notice in a newspaper, or qualified publication may not exceed the
lowest classified advertising rate charged to advertisers by the
newspaper, or qualified publication for comparable use of the
same amount of space for other purposes.
(3) After December 31, 2009, and before January 1, 2017, a
newspaper or qualified publication may, effective January 1 of
any year, increase the basic charges by not more than two and
three-quarters percent (2.75%) more than the basic charges that
were in effect during the previous year. However, the basic
charges for the first insertion of a public notice in a newspaper or
qualified publication may not exceed the lowest classified
advertising rate charged to advertisers by the newspaper or
qualified publication for comparable use of the same amount of
space for other purposes and must include all multiple insertion
discounts extended to the newspaper's other advertisers.
(4) After December 31, 2016, a newspaper, locality newspaper,
or qualified publication may, effective January 1 of any year,
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


increase the basic charges by not more than two and
three-quarters percent (2.75%) more than the basic charges that
were in effect during the previous year. However, the basic
charges for the first insertion of a public notice in a newspaper,
locality newspaper, or qualified publication may not exceed the
lowest classified advertising rate charged to advertisers by the
newspaper, locality newspaper, or qualified publication for
comparable use of the same amount of space for other purposes
and must include all multiple insertion discounts extended to the
newspaper's, locality newspaper's, or qualified publication's other
advertisers.
An additional charge of fifty percent (50%) shall be allowed for the
publication of all public notice advertising containing rule or tabular
work.
(c) All public notice advertisements shall be set in solid type that is
at least 7 point type, without any leads or other devices for increasing
space. All public notice advertisements shall be headed by not more
than two (2) lines, neither of which shall total more than four (4) solid
lines of the type in which the body of the advertisement is set. Public
notice advertisements may be submitted by an appointed or elected
official or a governmental agency to a newspaper, locality newspaper,
or qualified publication in electronic form, if the newspaper, locality
newspaper, or qualified publication is equipped to accept information
in compatible electronic form.
(d) Each newspaper, locality newspaper, or qualified publication
publishing public notice advertising shall submit proof of publication
and claim for payment in duplicate on each public notice advertisement
published. For each additional proof of publication required by a public
official, a charge of one dollar ($1) per copy shall be allowed each
newspaper, locality newspaper, or qualified publication furnishing
proof of publication.
(e) The circulation of a newspaper, locality newspaper, or qualified
publication is determined as follows:
(1) For a newspaper, by the circulation stated on line 10.C. (Total
Paid and/or Requested Circulation of Single Issue Published
Nearest to Filing Date) of the Statement of Ownership,
Management and Circulation required by 39 U.S.C. 3685 that was
filed during the previous year.
(2) For a locality newspaper, by a verified affidavit filed with each
agency, department, or office of the political subdivision that has
public notices the locality newspaper wants to publish. The
affidavit must:
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


(A) be filed with the agency, department, or office of the
political subdivision before January 1 of each year; and
(B) attest to the circulation of the locality newspaper for the
issue published nearest to October 1 of the previous year, as
determined by an independent audit of the locality newspaper
performed for the previous year.
(3) For a qualified publication, by a verified affidavit filed with
each governmental agency that has public notices the qualified
publication wants to publish. The affidavit must:
(A) be filed with the governmental agency before January 1 of
each year; and
(B) attest to the circulation of the qualified publication for the
issue published nearest to October 1 of the previous year.
(f) This subsection applies to a towing service acting as an agent of
a governmental agency to facilitate the removal of abandoned vehicles
or parts. A towing service shall be charged the basic rates charged for
all public notice advertising in subsection (b)(4) for providing the
notice required under IC 9-22-1-23.
(g) The basic charge for publication of a notice in an electronic
edition of a newspaper or locality newspaper shall be the same as
the basic charge for publication of the notice in the print edition.
(h) After June 30, 2028, the office of technology established by
IC 4-13.1-2-1 may not charge a fee to publish a notice on the state
public notice website.
SECTION 4. IC 5-3-1-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) This section applies to a notice that must
be published in accordance with this chapter.
(b) If a newspaper or locality newspaper maintains a website, a
notice that is published in the newspaper or locality newspaper must
also be posted on the website of the newspaper or locality newspaper.
The notice must appear on the website on the same day the notice
appears in the newspaper or locality newspaper.
(c) The state board of accounts shall develop a standard form for
notices posted on a newspaper's or locality newspaper's website.
(d) A newspaper or locality newspaper may not charge a fee for
posting a notice on the newspaper's or locality newspaper's website
under this section.
(b) As used in this section, "political subdivision" has the
meaning set forth in IC 5-3-5-3 (before its expiration).
(c) As used in this chapter, "state agency" has the meaning set
forth in IC 1-1-15-3.
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


(d) Notwithstanding any express statutory requirement of
publishing a notice in a specific form of media, a person satisfies
the statutory requirement by publishing the notice in any of the
following media:
(1) Publication in any of the following forms of a newspaper:
(A) A print edition newspaper that is published in or
circulates within the political subdivision specified in the
statute.
(B) An electronic edition published by the newspaper
described in clause (A).
(2) Publication in any of the following forms of a locality
newspaper:
(A) A print edition locality newspaper that circulates
within the political subdivision specified in the statute.
(B) An electronic edition published by the locality
newspaper described in clause (A).
(3) Publication on the state public notice website under
IC 5-3-1.6 in accordance with the following:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2028:
(i) a state agency; or
(ii) a political subdivision primarily located within a
county having a population of not more than fifty
thousand (50,000);
may make the first publication of a notice and any
subsequent publications of the notice that are required by
law on the state public notice website.
(B) Beginning January 1, 2029, a political subdivision
primarily located within a county having a population of
not more than one hundred thousand (100,000) may make
the first publication of a notice and any subsequent
publications of the notice that are required by law on the
state public notice website.
(C) Beginning July 1, 2029, any body corporate and politic
or other instrumentality of state or local government not
described in subdivision (1) or (2) may make the first
publication of a notice and any subsequent publications of
the notice that are required by law on the state public
notice website.
(4) Publication on a political subdivision website under
IC 5-3-5 until the date that the person is authorized to publish
notice on the state public notice website.
(5) Publication on the Indiana public notice website of the
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


Hoosier State Press Association.
(e) This section does not exempt a person from complying with
any other statutory requirement, including deadlines for
publication of notice and frequency of publication. However,
notwithstanding any law that requires a public notice to be
published on at least two (2) days and for a specified frequency, a
notice published on the state public notice website shall be
maintained on the state public notice website for the period as set
forth in IC 5-3-1.6-4.
(f) A newspaper or locality newspaper may not:
(1) charge a person a fee for viewing or searching the
newspaper's or locality newspaper's electronic edition for
public notices; or
(2) require a person to register on the newspaper's or locality
newspaper's website in order to view or search for public
notices in the electronic edition.
(g) The basic charge for publication of a notice in an electronic
edition of a newspaper or locality newspaper shall be the same as
the basic charge for publication of the notice in the print edition in
accordance with section 1 of this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 5-3-1-1.6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 1.6. (a) This section applies to a notice published by a
political subdivision in a newspaper or locality newspaper under
section 4 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies if a newspaper or locality newspaper
publishes:
(1) a print edition not more than three (3) times a week; and
(2) an electronic edition.
A notice may be published in either the print edition or the electronic
edition.
(c) This subsection applies if a newspaper or locality newspaper:
(1) publishes a print edition not more than two (2) times a week;
and
(2) does not publish an electronic edition.
A notice may be published in either the print edition or on the website
of the newspaper or locality newspaper. If the newspaper or locality
newspaper does not maintain a website, a notice may be published in
either the print edition or on the political subdivision's official website
(as defined in IC 5-3-5-2) in accordance with IC 5-3-5.
(d) A newspaper or locality newspaper may not:
(1) charge a person a fee for viewing or searching the website or
electronic edition for public notices; or
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


(2) require a person to register on the newspaper's or locality
newspaper's website in order to view or search for public notices
on the website.
(e) The basic charge for publication of a notice in an electronic
edition shall be the same as the basic charge for publication of the
notice in the print edition in accordance with section 1 of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 5-3-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.147-2016,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Whenever officers of a political subdivision
are required to publish a notice affecting the political subdivision, they
shall may publish the notice in two (2) newspapers of the forms of
media listed under section 1.5(d) of this chapter. If officers choose
to publish a notice in any form of a newspaper or locality
newspaper, the newspaper's or locality newspaper's print edition
must be published in or circulate within the political subdivision as
provided in section 1.5(d) of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to notices published by county officers.
If there is only one (1) newspaper published in the county, then
publication in that newspaper alone is sufficient.
(c) This subsection applies to notices published by city, town, or
school corporation officers. If there is only one (1) newspaper
published in the municipality or school corporation, then publication
in that newspaper alone is sufficient. If no newspaper is published in
the municipality or school corporation, then publication of the notice
shall be made in one (1) of the following:
(1) A locality newspaper that circulates within the municipality or
school corporation.
(2) A newspaper published in the county in which the
municipality or school corporation is located and that circulates
within the municipality or school corporation.
(d) This subsection applies to notices published by officers of
political subdivisions not covered by subsection (a) or (b). If there is
only one (1) newspaper published in the political subdivision, then the
notice shall be published in that newspaper. If no newspaper is
published in the political subdivision, then publication of the notice
shall be made in one (1) of the following:
(1) A locality newspaper that circulates within the municipality or
school corporation.
(2) A newspaper published in the county and that circulates
within the political subdivision.
(e) This subsection applies to a political subdivision, including a
city, town, or school corporation. Notwithstanding any other law, if a
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


political subdivision has territory in more than one (1) county, public
notices that are required by law or ordered to be published must be
given as follows:
(1) By publication in two (2) newspapers published within the
boundaries of the political subdivision.
(2) If only one (1) newspaper is published within the boundaries
of the political subdivision, by publication of the notice in that
newspaper and in one (1) of the following:
(A) A locality newspaper that circulates within the political
subdivision.
(B) In another newspaper:
(i) published in any county in which the political subdivision
extends; and
(ii) that has a general circulation in the political subdivision.
(3) If no newspaper is published within the boundaries of the
political subdivision, by publishing the notice in two (2)
publications, consisting of either or both of the following:
(A) A locality newspaper that circulates within the political
subdivision.
(B) A newspaper that:
(i) is published in any counties into which the political
subdivision extends; and
(ii) has a general circulation in the political subdivision.
(4) If only one (1) newspaper is published in any of the counties
into which the political subdivision extends, by publication of the
notice in one (1) of the following:
(A) A locality newspaper that circulates within the political
subdivision.
(B) The newspaper published in the county if the newspaper
circulates within the political subdivision.
(f) (b) A political subdivision may, in its discretion, publish public
notices in a qualified publication or additional newspapers or locality
newspapers to provide supplementary notification to the public. The
cost of publishing supplementary notification is a proper expenditure
of the political subdivision.
SECTION 7. IC 5-3-1.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 1.6. State Public Notice Website
Sec. 1. The definitions in IC 5-3-1 apply throughout this chapter.
Sec. 2. Not later than July 1, 2028, the office of technology
established by IC 4-13.1-2-1 shall establish and operate a state
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


public notice website as a repository for public notices.
Sec. 3. (a) The state public notice website shall:
(1) receive, publish, and store public notices; and
(2) be searchable by:
(A) county, city, town, township, or school corporation;
(B) date of publication or event; and
(C) subject, which may include:
(i) public hearing notices;
(ii) build, operate, or transfer notices under IC 5-23;
(iii) notices regarding the receiving of bids;
(iv) election notices;
(v) notices regarding the sales of bonds, notes, or
warrants;
(vi) notices regarding the cumulative or sinking funds;
and
(vii) notices regarding the adoption of ordinances.
(b) The office of technology shall implement a feature that
allows users of the state public notice website to request alerts sent
automatically to the user by electronic mail when a new notice is
posted on the state public notice website that matches the search
terms selected by the user.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a public notice
shall be maintained on the state public notice website for at least
seven (7) days after the day of publication.
(b) If a public notice is required by law to be published on at
least two (2) days and for a specified frequency, the notice shall be
maintained on the state public notice website from the first day
that publication of the notice is required by law until at least seven
(7) days after the last day that publication of the notice is required
by law.
Sec. 5. A person may submit a notice for publication directly to
the state public notice website.
Sec. 6. The office of technology shall do the following:
(1) Maintain the state public notice website to be accessible
and searchable by the public at all times, other than during
maintenance or circumstances outside the operator's control.
(2) Not charge the person placing the notice a fee for:
(A) publishing a public notice on the state public notice
website; or
(B) viewing or searching the state public notice website for
public notices.
(3) Not require a person to register in order to view or search
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


for public notices on the website.
Sec. 7. Proof of publication of notice shall be provided in
accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court.
Sec. 8. IC 5-3-1-2.3 and any other provision regarding an error
or omission in a notice published in a newspaper also apply to a
publication of a notice on the state public notice website.
SECTION 8. IC 5-3-5-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 10. This chapter expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 9. IC 5-15-5.1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.222-2023,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Subject to approval by the oversight
committee on public records created by section 18 of this chapter, the
administration shall do the following:
(1) Establish a forms management program for state forms.
(2) Establish and maintain a central cross index filing system of
all state forms.
(3) Establish a statewide records management program,
prescribing the standards and procedures for:
(A) retention and preservation of agency records; and
(B) records management training for agencies and local
government.
However, the investigative and criminal history records of the
state police department are exempted from this requirement.
(4) Establish and operate a statewide archival program to be
called the Indiana state archives for the permanent government
records of the state and local governments, provide consultant
services for archival programs, conduct surveys, and provide
training for records coordinators.
(5) Establish and operate a statewide records preservation
laboratory.
(6) Prepare, develop, and implement records retention schedules.
(7) Establish and operate a central records center to be called the
Indiana state records center, which shall accept all records
approved for transfer to it, provide secure storage and reference
service for the same, and submit written notice to the applicable
agency of intended destruction of records in accordance with
approved retention schedules.
(8) Demand from any person, organization, or body who has
illegal possession of original state or local government records
those records, which shall be delivered to the administration.
(9) Have the authority to examine all forms and records housed or
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


possessed by state agencies and local governments for the purpose
of fulfilling the provisions of this chapter.
(10) In coordination with the office of technology established by
IC 4-13.1-2-1, establish standards to ensure the preservation of
adequate and permanent computerized and auxiliary automated
information records of state agencies and local government.
(11) Notwithstanding IC 5-14-3-8, establish a schedule of fees for
services provided to patrons of the Indiana state archives, patrons
of the state imaging and microfilm laboratory, and state agencies.
A copying fee established under this subdivision may exceed the
copying fee set forth in IC 5-14-3-8(c).
(12) Advise the office of technology established by IC 4-13.1-2-1
with respect to records management and archival principles as
applicable to the purchase of all electronic content and
information management systems.
(13) In coordination with the office of technology established
by IC 4-13.1-2-1, establish standards and guidelines for the
transfer and preservation of public notices from the state
public notice website to the Indiana archives and records
administration to preserve public notices for historical
purposes.
(14) Enter into memoranda of understanding with agencies,
as necessary, to ensure transfer of public notices from the
state public notice website under IC 5-3-1.6 to preserve public
notices for historical purposes.
(b) Fees collected under subsection (a)(11) shall be deposited in the
state archives preservation and reproduction account established by
section 5.3 of this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 6-1.1-28-0.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.7. The county assessor of the county responsible
for administration of a multiple county property tax assessment board
of appeals under section 0.5 of this chapter shall give notice of the
time, date, place, and purpose of each annual session of the multiple
county property tax assessment board of appeals. The county assessor
shall give the notice two (2) weeks before the first meeting of the
multiple county property tax assessment board of appeals by:
(1) publication of the notice within the geographic area over
which the multiple county property tax assessment board of
appeals has jurisdiction in the same manner as political
subdivisions subject to IC 5-3-1-4(e) IC 5-3-1-4 are required to
publish notice; and
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


(2) posting of the notice on the county assessor's website.
SECTION 11. IC 36-8-12-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 258, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) A volunteer fire department
that provides service within a jurisdiction served by the department
may establish a schedule of charges for the services that the department
provides not to exceed the state fire marshal's recommended schedule
for services. The volunteer fire department or its agent may collect a
service charge according to this schedule from the owner of property
that receives service if the following conditions are met:
(1) At the following times, the department gives notice under
IC 5-3-1-4(d) IC 5-3-1-4 in each political subdivision served by
the department of the amount of the service charge for each
service that the department provides:
(A) Before the schedule of service charges is initiated.
(B) When there is a change in the amount of a service charge.
(2) The property owner has not sent written notice to the
department to refuse service by the department to the owner's
property.
(3) The bill for payment of the service charge:
(A) is submitted to the property owner in writing within thirty
(30) days after the services are provided;
(B) includes a copy of a fire incident report in the form
prescribed by the state fire marshal, if the service was
provided for an event that requires a fire incident report;
(C) must contain verification that the bill has been approved
by the chief of the volunteer fire department; and
(D) must contain language indicating that correspondence
from the property owner and any question from the property
owner regarding the bill should be directed to the department.
(4) Payment is remitted directly to the governmental unit
providing the service.
(b) A volunteer fire department shall use the revenue collected from
the fire service charges under this section:
(1) for the purchase of equipment, buildings, and property for
firefighting, fire protection, or other emergency services;
(2) for deposit in the township firefighting and emergency
services fund established under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the
township firefighting fund established under
IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2)(A); or
(3) to pay principal and interest on a loan made by the department
of homeland security established by IC 10-19-2-1 or a division of
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


the department for the purchase of new or used firefighting and
other emergency equipment or apparatus.
(c) Any administrative fees charged by a fire department's agent
must be paid only from fees that are collected and allowed by Indiana
law and the fire marshal's schedule of fees.
(d) An agent who processes fees on behalf of a fire department shall
send all bills, notices, and other related materials to both the fire
department and the person being billed for services.
(e) All fees allowed by Indiana law and the fire marshal's fee
schedule must be itemized separately from any other charges.
(f) If at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the money received by a
volunteer fire department for providing fire protection or emergency
services is received under one (1) or more contracts with one (1) or
more political subdivisions (as defined in IC 34-6-2.1-155), the
legislative body of a contracting political subdivision must approve the
schedule of service charges established under subsection (a) before the
schedule of service charges is initiated in that political subdivision.
(g) A volunteer fire department that:
(1) has contracted with a political subdivision to provide fire
protection or emergency services; and
(2) charges for services under this section;
must submit a report to the legislative body of the political subdivision
before April 1 of each year indicating the amount of service charges
collected during the previous calendar year and how those funds have
been expended.
(h) The state fire marshal shall annually prepare and publish a
recommended schedule of service charges for fire protection services.
(i) The volunteer fire department or its agent may maintain a civil
action to recover an unpaid service charge under this section and may,
if it prevails, recover all costs of the action, including reasonable
attorney's fees.
SECTION 12. IC 36-8-12-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 259, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) If a political subdivision has
not imposed its own false alarm fee or service charge, a volunteer fire
department that provides service within the jurisdiction may establish
a service charge for responding to false alarms. The volunteer fire
department may collect the false alarm service charge from the owner
of the property if the volunteer fire department dispatches firefighting
apparatus or personnel to a building or premises in the township in
response to:
(1) an alarm caused by improper installation or improper
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


maintenance; or
(2) a drill or test, if the fire department is not previously notified
that the alarm is a drill or test.
However, if the owner of property that constitutes the owner's residence
establishes that the alarm is under a maintenance contract with an
alarm company and that the alarm company has been notified of the
improper installation or maintenance of the alarm, the alarm company
is liable for the payment of the fee or service charge.
(b) Before establishing a false alarm service charge, the volunteer
fire department must provide notice under IC 5-3-1-4(d) IC 5-3-1-4 in
each political subdivision served by the department of the amount of
the false alarm service charge. The notice required by this subsection
must be given:
(1) before the false alarm service charge is initiated; and
(2) before a change in the amount of the false alarm service
charge.
(c) A volunteer fire department may not collect a false alarm service
charge from a property owner or alarm company unless the
department's bill for payment of the service charge:
(1) is submitted to the property owner in writing within thirty (30)
days after the false alarm; and
(2) includes a copy of a fire incident report in the form prescribed
by the state fire marshal.
(d) A volunteer fire department shall use the money collected from
the false alarm service charge imposed under this section:
(1) for the purchase of equipment, buildings, and property for fire
fighting, fire protection, or other emergency services;
(2) for deposit in the township firefighting and emergency
services fund established under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the
township firefighting fund established under
IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2)(A); or
(3) to pay principal and interest on a loan made by the department
of homeland security established by IC 10-19-2-1 or a division of
the department for the purchase of new or used firefighting and
other emergency equipment or apparatus.
(e) If at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the money received by a
volunteer fire department for providing fire protection or emergency
services is received under one (1) or more contracts with one (1) or
more political subdivisions (as defined in IC 34-6-2.1-155), the
legislative body of a contracting political subdivision must approve the
false alarm service charge established under subsection (a) before the
service charge is initiated in that political subdivision.
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


(f) A volunteer fire department that:
(1) has contracted with a political subdivision to provide fire
protection or emergency services; and
(2) imposes a false alarm service charge under this section;
must submit a report to the legislative body of the political subdivision
before April 1 of each year indicating the amount of false alarm
charges collected during the previous calendar year and how those
funds have been expended.
(g) The volunteer fire department may maintain a civil action to
recover unpaid false alarm service charges imposed under this section
and may, if it prevails, recover all costs of the action, including
reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 13. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The legislative
services agency shall prepare legislation for introduction in the
2027 regular session of the general assembly to make any necessary
amendments to the Indiana Code to conform to the amendments
made by this act.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Government and Regulatory
Reform, to which was referred House Bill 1283, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 5, line 18, delete "IC 5-3-1.6." and insert "IC 5-3-1.6 in
accordance with the following:
(A) Beginning July 1, 2028:
(i) a state agency; or
(ii) a political subdivision primarily located within a
county having a population of not more than fifty
thousand (50,000);
may make the first publication of a notice and any
subsequent publications of the notice that are required by
law on the state public notice website.
(B) Beginning January 1, 2029, a political subdivision
primarily located within a county having a population of
not more than one hundred thousand (100,000) may make
the first publication of a notice and any subsequent
publications of the notice that are required by law on the
state public notice website.
(C) Beginning July 1, 2029, any body corporate and politic
or other instrumentality of state or local government not
described in subdivision (1) or (2) may make the first
publication of a notice and any subsequent publications of
the notice that are required by law on the state public
notice website.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1283 as introduced.)
MILLER D
Committee Vote: yeas 9, nays 4.
HB 1283—LS 6931/DI 87